Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Distribution and Sales

§ 63-17-51.
Short title.

Sections 63-17-51 through 63-17-119 shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-01; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 418, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 63-17-53.
Legislative findings and declarations.

The legislature finds and declares that the distribution and sales of motor vehicles in the State of Mississippi vitally affects the general economy of the state and the public interest and the public welfare. The legislature further finds and declares that it is necessary, in the exercise of its police power, to regulate and to license motor vehicle manufacturers, factory branches and divisions, distributors, distributor branches and divisions, distributor representatives, wholesalers, wholesaler branches and divisions, dealers and salesmen doing business in the State of Mississippi in order (1) to prevent frauds, unfair practices, discrimination, impositions and other abuses upon the citizens of the State of Mississippi, (2) to avoid undue control of the independent motor vehicle dealer by motor vehicle manufacturing and distributing organizations, (3) to foster and keep alive vigorous and healthy competition, (4) to prevent the creation or perpetuation of monopolies, (5) to prevent the practice of requiring the buying of special features, accessories, special models, appliances and equipment not desired by a motor vehicle dealer or the ultimate purchaser, (6) to prevent false and misleading advertising, (7) to promote and keep alive a sound system of distribution of motor vehicles to the public, and (8) to promote the public safety and welfare.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-02; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-55.
Definitions.

The following words, terms and phrases, when used in the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law, shall have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this section, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:

“Motor vehicle” means any motor-driven vehicle of the sort and kind required to have a Mississippi road or bridge privilege license, and shall include, but not be limited to, motorcycles. “Motor vehicle” shall also mean an engine, transmission, or rear axle manufactured for installation in a vehicle having as its primary purpose the transport of person or persons or property on a public highway and having a gross vehicle weight rating of more than sixteen thousand (16,000) pounds, whether or not attached to a vehicle chassis.

“Motor vehicle dealer” means any person, firm, partnership, copartnership, association, corporation, trust or legal entity, not excluded by paragraph (c) of this section, who holds a bona fide contract or franchise in effect with a manufacturer, distributor or wholesaler of new motor vehicles, and a license under the provisions of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law, and such duly franchised and licensed motor vehicle dealers shall be the sole and only persons, firms, partnerships, copartnerships, associations, corporations, trusts or legal entities entitled to sell and publicly or otherwise solicit and advertise for sale new motor vehicles as such.

The term “motor vehicle dealer” does not include:

Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians or other persons appointed by or acting under judgment, decree or order of any court;

Public officers while performing their duties as such officers;

Employees of persons, corporations or associations enumerated in paragraph (c)(i) of this section when engaged in the specific performance of their duties as such employees; or

A motor vehicle manufacturer operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1; and the provisions of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law shall not apply to:

1. a. Any lease by such a motor vehicle manufacturer of three (3) or fewer motor vehicles at any one time and related vehicle maintenance, of any line of vehicle produced by the manufacturer or its subsidiaries, to any one (1) employee of the motor vehicle manufacturer on a direct basis; or

b. Any sale or other disposition of such motor vehicles by the motor vehicle manufacturer at the end of a lease through direct sales to employees of the manufacturer or through an open auction or auction limited to dealers of the manufacturer’s vehicle line or its subsidiaries’ vehicle lines; or

2. Any sale or other disposition by such a motor vehicle manufacturer of motor vehicles for which the manufacturer obtained distinguishing number tags under Section 27-19-309(8).

“New motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle which has not been previously sold to any person except a distributor or wholesaler or motor vehicle dealer for resale.

“Ultimate purchaser” means, with respect to any new motor vehicle, the first person, other than a motor vehicle dealer purchasing in his capacity as such dealer, who in good-faith purchases such new motor vehicle for purposes other than for resale.

“Retail sale” or “sale at retail” means the act or attempted act of selling, bartering, exchanging or otherwise disposing of a new motor vehicle to an ultimate purchaser for use as a consumer.

“Motor vehicle salesman” means any person who is employed as a salesman by a motor vehicle dealer whose duties include the selling or offering for sale of new motor vehicles.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission.

“Manufacturer” means any person, firm, association, corporation or trust, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or assembles new motor vehicles.

“Distributor” or “wholesaler” means any person, firm, association, corporation or trust, resident or nonresident, who, in whole or in part, sells or distributes new motor vehicles to motor vehicle dealers, or who maintains distributor representatives.

“Factory branch” means a branch or division office maintained by a person, firm, association, corporation or trust who manufactures or assembles new motor vehicles for sale to distributors or wholesalers, to motor vehicle dealers, or for directing or supervising, in whole or in part, its representatives.

“Distributor branch” means a branch or division office similarly maintained by a distributor or wholesaler for the same purposes a factory branch or division is maintained.

“Factory representative” means a representative employed by a person, firm, association, corporation or trust who manufactures or assembles new motor vehicles, or by a factory branch, for the purpose of making or promoting the sale of his, its or their new motor vehicles, or for supervising or contacting his, its or their dealers or prospective dealers.

“Distributor representative” means a representative similarly employed by a distributor, distributor branch or wholesaler.

“Person” means and includes, individually and collectively, individuals, firms, partnerships, copartnerships, associations, corporations and trusts, or any other forms of business enterprise, or any legal entity.

“Good faith” means the duty of each party to any franchise agreement, and all officers, employees or agents franchise, to act in a fair and equitable manner toward each other in the performance of the respective obligations under the franchise agreement.

“Coerce” means to compel or attempt to compel by threat or duress. However, recommendation, exposition, persuasion, urging or argument shall not be deemed to constitute coercion.

“Special tools” are those which a dealer was required to purchase by the manufacturer or distributor for service on that manufacturer’s product.

“Motor vehicle lessor” means any person, not excluded by paragraph (c) of this section, engaged in the motor vehicle leasing or rental business.

“Specialty vehicle” means a motor vehicle manufactured by a second stage manufacturer by purchasing motor vehicle components, e.g. frame and drive train, and completing the manufacturer of finished motor vehicles for the purpose of resale with the primary manufacturer warranty unimpaired, to a limited commercial market rather than the consuming public. Specialty vehicles include garbage trucks, ambulances, fire trucks, buses, limousines, hearses and other similar limited purpose vehicles as the commission may by regulation provide.

“Auto auction” means (i) any person who provides a place of business or facilities for the wholesale exchange of motor vehicles by and between duly licensed motor vehicle dealers, (ii) any motor vehicle dealer licensed to sell used motor vehicles selling motor vehicles using an auction format but not on consignment, or (iii) any person who provides the facilities for or is in the business of selling in an auction format motor vehicles.

“Motor home” means a motor vehicle that is designed and constructed primarily to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping or travel use.

“Dealer-operator” means the individual designated in the franchise agreement as the operator of the motor vehicle dealership.

“Franchise” or “franchise agreement” means a written contract or agreement between a motor vehicle dealer and a manufacturer or its distributor or factory branch by which the motor vehicle dealer is authorized to engage in the business of selling or leasing the specific makes, models or classifications of new motor vehicles marketed or leased by the manufacturer and designated in the agreement or any addendum to such agreement.

“Net cost” means the price the motor vehicle dealer pays for new motor vehicles, supplies, parts, equipment, signs, furnishings and special tools, minus any applicable discounts or subsidies obtained by the motor vehicle dealer.

“Line or make” means a collection of models, series, or groups of motor vehicles manufactured by or for a particular manufacturer, distributor or importer offered for sale, lease or distribution pursuant to a common trademark, service mark or brand name; however:

Multiple brand names or marks may constitute a single line or make, but only when included in a common motor vehicle dealer agreement and the manufacturer, distributor or importer offers such vehicles bearing the multiple names of marks together only, and not separately, to its authorized motor vehicle dealers.

Motor vehicles bearing a common brand name or mark may constitute separate line or makes when such vehicles are of different vehicle types or are intended for different types of use, provided that either:

1. The manufacturer has expressly defined or covered the subject line or makes of vehicles as separate and distinct line or makes in the applicable dealer agreements; or

2. The manufacturer has consistently characterized the subject vehicles as constituting separate and distinct line or makes to its dealer network.

“Site-control agreement” or “exclusive use agreement” means an agreement that, regardless of its name, title, form or the parties entering into it, has the effect of:

Controlling the use and development of the premises of a motor vehicle dealer’s franchise or facilities;

Requiring a motor vehicle dealer to establish or maintain an exclusive motor vehicle dealership facility on the premises of the motor vehicle dealer’s franchise or facility;

Restricting the power or authority of the dealer or the lessor, if the motor vehicle dealer leases the dealership premises, to transfer, sell, lease, develop, redevelop or change the use of the dealership premises, whether by sublease, lease, collateral pledge of lease, right of first refusal to purchase or lease, option to purchase or lease or any similar arrangement; or

Establishing a valuation process or formula for the motor vehicle dealership premises that does not allow for the motor vehicle dealership premises to be transferred, sold or leased by the motor vehicle dealer at the highest and best use valuation for the motor vehicle dealership premises.

“Market area” means the area of responsibility set forth in the franchise agreement.

“Core parts” means those original vehicle manufacturer parts that are listed in the original vehicle manufacturer’s or distributor’s current parts catalog, for which there is a core charge and which are returnable to the manufacturer or distributor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-03; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 3; Laws, 1982, ch. 392; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 399, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 418, § 8; Laws, 2000, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 20; Laws, 2006, ch. 432, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 9; Laws, 2014, ch. 349, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 63-17-57.
Creation of Motor Vehicle Commission; appointment and terms of members; officers.

There is hereby created the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission to be composed of eight (8) members, one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the Attorney General from the state at large for a term of four (4) years and one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the Secretary of State from the state at large for a term of four (4) years, and six (6) licensees who shall be appointed by the Governor, one (1) from the state at large and one (1) from each of the five (5) congressional districts of this state for terms of the following duration: the term of the member from the state at large shall expire at the time the incumbent Governor’s term expires, the term of the member appointed from the First Congressional District shall expire on June 30, 1973, the term of the member appointed from the Second Congressional District shall expire on June 30, 1974, the term of the member appointed from the Third Congressional District shall expire on June 30, 1976, the term of the member from the Fourth Congressional District shall expire on June 30, 1977, and the term of the member appointed from the Fifth Congressional District shall expire on June 30, 1978. Each member shall serve until his successor is appointed and qualified. At the expiration of the term of the member initially appointed by the Attorney General each successor member shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years by the incumbent Attorney General, and at the expiration of the term of the member appointed by the Secretary of State each successor member shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years by the incumbent Secretary. At the expiration of a term for which each of the initial appointments of the Governor is made, each successor member shall be appointed for a term of seven (7) years except that the term of the member appointed from the state at large shall be coterminous with that of the Governor making the appointment. The members of the commission as constituted on July 1, 2006, who are appointed by the Governor and whose terms have not expired shall serve the balance of their terms, after which time the gubernatorial appointments shall be made as follows: The Governor shall appoint one (1) member of the commission from each of the four (4) congressional districts and two (2) from the state at large.

The member appointed from the state at large by the Governor shall serve as chairman of the commission and one (1) of the other members appointed by the Governor shall be designated by him to serve as vice chairman. In the absence of the chairman at any meeting of the commission the vice chairman shall preside and perform the duties of the chairman.

In the event of a vacancy created by the death, resignation or removal of any member of the commission the vacancy shall be filled by appointment of the Governor, Attorney General or the Secretary of State, as the case may be, for the unexpired portion of the term. All appointments made pursuant to this section shall be made with the advice and consent of the Senate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-04; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 432, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 63-17-59.
Qualifications of members of commission.

Each of the members appointed to the commission shall be a citizen of the United States and a resident of the State of Mississippi and a qualified elector of the jurisdiction from which appointed, and each shall be of good moral character. The members of the commission initially appointed by the attorney general and the secretary of state and all members subsequently appointed by them shall never have been engaged in the manufacture, distribution or sale of motor vehicles and shall not thereafter be so engaged as long as they are members of the commission. The members of the commission initially appointed by the governor and all such members subsequently appointed by an incumbent governor shall be qualified to receive a license under the provisions of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law and shall be holders of a current license within ninety days after their respective appointments and shall continue to be holders of a current license at all times thereafter so long as they are such members.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-04; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-61.
Organization of commission; oath and bond of members; quorum; voting; seal.

The commission shall meet at Jackson and complete its organization immediately after the entire membership thereof has been appointed and has qualified.

The chairman and each member of the commission shall, before entering upon the discharge of the duties of his office, take and subscribe to the oath of office prescribed by Section 268 of the constitution of this state, and shall file the same in the office of the secretary of state.

The commission shall purchase either a blanket position honesty or faithful performance bond from some surety company authorized to do business in this state in the penal sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), made payable to the State of Mississippi, conditioned for the honest and faithful performance of the duties of the chairman and each member of the commission, the executive secretary of the commission and all other employees of the commission, said bond to be approved by the governor and filed in the office of the secretary of state. The commission shall keep such a bond in force at all times and from and after the date the commission is organized.

A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business. Neither the chairman nor the vice-chairman, when the vice-chairman is presiding, shall be entitled to vote unless his vote is necessary to break a tie vote.

The commission shall adopt and use a common seal for the authentication of its records and orders.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-04; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-63.
Meetings of commission.

The commission shall hold all of its regular monthly meetings in its office at Jackson, Mississippi. The commission may, upon approval of a majority of its members, hold special meetings and the hearings provided for under Section 63-17-93 at any time and place within the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-04; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-65.
Compensation of members of commission.

The chairman and members of the commission shall receive per diem in the amount set forth in Section 25-3-69 for each and every day actually and necessarily spent in attending the meetings of the commission, and shall be reimbursed for their reasonable subsistence and traveling expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with Section 25-3-41. The chairman shall require itemized statements of all such reimbursable expenses and shall audit or cause to be audited such statements before approving the same for payment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-04; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 4; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-67.
Executive director; employment of clerical and professional assistance; office.

The commission shall employ a qualified person to serve as executive director thereof, to serve at the pleasure of the commission, and shall fix his salary, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board, and shall define and prescribe his duties. The executive director shall be in charge of the commission’s office and shall devote full time to the duties thereof. His duties shall include, but not be limited to, the collection of all fees and charges under the provisions of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law, keeping a record of all proceedings of the commission and an accurate account of all monies received and disbursed by the commission, all of which records shall be considered as public records. The commission may employ such clerical and professional help and incur such expenses as may be reasonably necessary for the proper discharge of its duties.

The commission shall maintain its office and transact its business, except as otherwise provided, at Jackson, Mississippi, and the Department of Finance and Administration shall approve suitable quarters and the remuneration therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-04; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 4; Laws, 1977, ch. 411, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 9; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-69.
Promulgation, etc., of rules and regulations by commission.

The commission shall have power to prescribe, issue, amend and rescind such reasonable rules and regulations as may be reasonably necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law. No rule or regulation shall be effective until thirty days after copies of the proposed rule or regulation shall have been mailed to all motor vehicle dealers operating in the State of Mississippi, and a representative of each manufacturer, wholesaler, and distributor whose motor vehicles are sold therein, whether said representative is located within or without the State of Mississippi, and a notice setting forth either the terms or substance of said proposed rule or regulation and the time and place of a hearing thereon shall have been published in a newspaper of general circulation in the state and published in the City of Jackson. Such hearing may be held at any time twenty days after publication of such notice, but such rules or regulations shall not become effective until a hearing thereon. All rules, regulations and forms adopted by the commission shall be filed with its executive secretary and shall be readily available for public inspection and examination during reasonable business hours. A copy of said rules, regulations and forms shall also be filed and recorded in the office of the secretary of state. Any interested person shall have the right to petition the commission for issuance, amendment or repeal of a rule or regulation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-04; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-71.
Motor vehicle commission fund.

All funds received by the commission shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of a special fund to be known as the “motor vehicle commission fund.” All expenses incurred in the organization, maintenance and operation of the commission shall be paid from such special fund. The expenditure of all such funds shall be made only pursuant to appropriation approved by the legislature and as provided by law. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be audited annually by the state auditor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-04; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 11; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 264; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1991.